Delaware, session 153, HB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 87A, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Subchapter VIII-A. Innovating Delaware Act Â§ 8775A. Short title. This Act is known and may be cited as the âInnovating Delaware Act.â Â§ 8776A. Definitions. As used in this subchapter: (1) âAcceleratorâ means a company that, for a fixed term, funds, educates, mentors, trains, or provides other support services, including low-cost facilities, to early-stage technology companies, who are located in or recruited to a location in Delaware, for the purpose of accelerating the early-stage technology companyâs development and growth. (2) âEconomic Development Organizationâ means an organization that is determined by the Division of Small Business to be an entity not operating for profit which is charged with improving the State or a region of the State and has a record of supporting or otherwise participating in economic development in the State. (3) âInnovate Delawareâ means the program described in Â§Â§ 8777A through 8780A of this title. (4) âInnovating Delaware Tax Creditâ or âIDTCâ means the tax credit provided for in Â§ 8780A of this title. (5) âInnovative industryâ includes advanced manufacturing, aerospace, agriculture, bioscience, biotechnology, electronics, energy and natural resources, engineering, life sciences, information technology industries, or any other industry as determined by Division of Small Business. (6) âMinorityâ means a person who is a member of a racial or ethnic group other than the racial or ethnic group that represents the majority of the Stateâs population. (7) âTechnology companyâ means a company that earns at least 75% of the companyâs revenue from any of the fields of education, healthcare, energy, agriculture, infrastructure, software, robotics, nutrition, aerospace, automotive, financial services, science, technology, or mathematics. Â§ 8777A. Projects available for tax credit. An Economic Development Organization may apply to the Division of Small Business to establish an Innovating Delaware Tax Credit Program to undertake any of the following projects: (1) The creation, operation, or support of an accelerator for technology companies, provided that the application is accompanied by an economic impact report. (2) The creation, operation, or support of programs designed to provide funding, workforce development, or other resources for an innovative company that meets either of the following criteria: a. The company is a for-profit business that is headquartered in Delaware, predominantly conducts an activity in an innovative industry, has fewer than 15 employees at the time the funding agreement is executed, and has average gross revenues of less than 1 million dollars in the company for at least 3 years prior to the execution of the funding agreement. b. The company is a for-profit business that is headquartered in Delaware, predominantly conducts an activity in an innovative industry, has fewer than 75 employees at the time the funding agreement is executed, and is at least 51% owned and controlled by 1 or more persons who is a woman, minority, veteran, service-disabled veteran, or person with a disability. Â§ 8778A. Application. The application provided under Â§ 8777A of this title must include all of the following: (1) Proof that the Economic Development Organization has in full force and effect a conflict-of-interest policy consistent with that found in the instructions to Form 1023 issued by the Internal Revenue Service. (2) A notarized affirmation that the submission of the application does not violate the conflict-of-interest policy consistent with that found in the instructions to Form 1023 issued by the Internal Revenue Service. (3) A sufficiently detailed plan that shows the project meets the criteria in Â§ 8777A. Â§ 8779A. Application and approval. (a) The Division of Small Business has the authority to approve applications. (b) If the application is approved, the Division of Small Business will specify the amount of Innovating Delaware Tax Credits allocated to complete the project detailed in the application of the Economic Development Organization. The Division of Small Business will notify the Division of Revenue of such amount. (c) Following approval by the Division of Small Business, the Division of Small Business and the Economic Development Organization shall enter into an agreement that must do all of the following: (1) Require that the Innovative Delaware Tax Credits are used only for the purposes approved by Division of Small Business. (2) Require the Economic Development Organization to make annual reports to the Division of Small Business on the disposition of the Innovating Delaware Tax Credits and include an economic impact report. (3) Require that the Economic Development Organization notify the Division of Small Business upon completion of the project. Â§ 8780A. Innovating Delaware Tax Credit. (a) A taxpayer may be allowed an Innovating Delaware Tax Credit for funds given to a project approved under this subchapter by the Division of Small Business. (b) If a taxpayer provides funds to an approved project and is allowed an Innovating Delaware Tax Credit it may be applied against any of the following: (1) To offset income taxes or an estimated tax payment of income taxes. (2) To offset the state franchise tax. (3) Any other tax as allowable by the Division of Revenue or the Secretary of State. (c) The Innovating Delaware Tax Credit may not cause a taxpayerâs tax liability to be reduced by more than 50% for any taxable year. Any unused credit may be carried forward for no more than 5 years. (d) The cumulative amount of funding approved pursuant to this section may not exceed 3 million dollars in a calendar year for calendar years beginning January 1, 2027. (e) The Secretary of State will provide administrative assistance to manage the Innovating Delaware Tax Credit program. (f) The Division of Small Business shall adopt rules and regulations to administer this subchapter, including a process to receive, review, approve or deny applications, and approve or deny tax credits. (g) Any report or return containing credits taken under this section may be shared with any person for the purpose of enforcement and the awarded applicant is deemed to consent to the disclosure. SYNOPSIS This Substitute for House Bill 211 creates the Innovate Delaware Program. This Program allows an Economic Development Organization to apply for a tax credit program through the Division of Small Business. This Substitute also lowers the cap on appropriations to support the tax credit program from 10 million to 3 million dollars in a calendar year.